District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-301.05

Informal internal review.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-274, § 105, 46 DCR 1294
Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-229, § 2(d), 59 DCR 13592

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-571.5.